Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-403
District and county court clerks; deputies; acknowledgments; validity.

Deputy clerks of the district and county courts in this state are authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds and other instruments in writing in the name of their principals, and the acknowledgments shall be as legal and as valid as if taken by their principals.

Laws 1870, § 1, p. 17;

R.S.1913, § 5743;

C.S.1922, § 5072;

C.S.1929, § 84-809;

R.S.1943, § 84-809;

R.S.1943, § 84-809;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 84-809;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 37.